Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-817
Applicability of sections.

Sections 72-811 to 72-818 shall apply to every state agency except the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges, the Department of Aeronautics, and the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, except that any such agency may elect to include under such sections any building or land for which it has responsibility. Such sections shall not apply to interests in real property held by the Department of Roads.

Laws 1988, LB 1143, § 7;

Laws 1990, LB 830, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 567, § 6.